Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 3.2-5200.
Duty of Commissioner to foster dairy industry.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to foster and encourage the dairy industry of the Commonwealth, and for that purpose he shall investigate the general conditions of the creameries, cheese factories, condensed milk factories, skimming stations, milk stations, and farm dairies in the Commonwealth, with full power to enter upon any premises for such investigation, with the object in view of improving the quality and creating and maintaining uniformity of the dairy products of the Commonwealth. Should it become necessary in the judgment of the Commissioner, he may cause instruction to be given in any facility or in any locality of the Commonwealth, in order to promote the proper feeding and care of cows, or the practical operation of any plant producing dairy products, and in order to procure such a uniform and standard quality of dairy products in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-341; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-420; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to power of municipal corporations to regulate and inspect production, preparation, storage, distribution and sale of milk, food and food products, see §

15.2-1109

.

§ 3.2-5201.
Conformity with regulations of U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and Department of Agriculture; compliance with Administrative Process Act.

In adopting regulations for the purpose of sanitation and to prevent deception, the Board shall be guided by those regulations recommended by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and the U.S. Department of Agriculture. The definitions and standards so adopted may conform, so far as practical, to the definitions and standards adopted or recommended by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services or the U.S. Department of Agriculture. The regulations authorized by §§

3.2-5212

,

3.2-5213

, and by this section shall be adopted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1970, c. 48, § 3.1-562.2; 2008, c. 860.

Editor’s note.

In the last sentence, “3.2-5212” was substituted for “3.2-5206” at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 3.2-5202.
Sale of products not subject to local supervision.

Products produced, processed, or manufactured under the regulations adopted under this chapter may be sold in all localities in the Commonwealth and shall not be subject to regulation, by ordinance or otherwise, supervision or inspection of any political subdivision wherein the products are produced, processed, manufactured, or sold.

History.

1970, c. 48, § 3.1-562.4; 1970, c. 49, § 3.1-530.5; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5203.
Importing of products.

No regulation adopted under this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the sale within the Commonwealth of any product that is produced outside of the Commonwealth under laws or regulations of the exporting state or political subdivision that are substantially equivalent to regulations adopted under this article and that are enforced with equal effectiveness.

No Grade A raw milk shall be imported into the Commonwealth by any person who does not possess a permit issued under conditions prescribed by the Board. The Board shall adopt regulations for the importation of raw bulk milk from points beyond routine inspection of the Commonwealth to insure the quality of milk and milk products, to determine volume of product shipped into the Commonwealth, to be assured of the original source of production, and to provide for the best interest of the Commonwealth, and for the protection of the consuming public.

History.

1970, c. 48, § 3.1-562.5; 1970, c. 49, § 3.1-530.6; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5204.
Warning and punishment of persons using or furnishing impure milk.

Whenever it is determined by the Commissioner that any person is using, selling, or furnishing to any facility, milk dealer, the retail trade, or to any consumer of milk, any impure or unwholesome milk or cream, which impurity or unwholesomeness is caused by the unsanitary or filthy conditions of the premises where cows are kept or by the unsanitary or filthy care of handling of the cows, or from the use of unclean utensils or from unwholesome food, or from any other cause, such person shall first be notified and warned by the Commissioner not to use, sell, or furnish such milk or cream to any facility, milk dealers, the retail trade, or to any consumer of milk. Any person who fails to obey such notice and warning and continues to use, sell, or furnish to any skimming station, creamery, cheese factory, condensed milk factory, farm dairy, milk dealer, or to the retail trade impure or unwholesome milk or cream, is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-342; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-421; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5205.
Injunctions.

If any person violates any provision of this article or the regulations adopted hereunder, then either the Commissioner or the State Health Commissioner may petition any appropriate circuit court for relief by injunction, without being compelled to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist.

History.

1970, c. 49, § 3.1-530.8; 2008, c. 860.